Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-701.03
Department of Roads; assume highway
safety program of Department of Motor Vehicles.

Beginning on July 1, 2009, the Department
of Roads shall assume responsibility for the powers and duties of the highway
safety program of the Department of Motor Vehicles, except that the Department
of Motor Vehicles shall retain jurisdiction over the Motorcycle Safety Education
Act.

Laws 2009, LB219, § 2.

Motorcycle Safety Education Act, see section 60-2120.